Hawaii statutes.
[§188-42.5] Hihiwai, hapawai, and
opae kala‘ole selling prohibited. It shall be unlawful for any
person at any time to sell or offer for sale any hihiwai, hapawai, and opae
kala‘ole taken from any of the waters within the jurisdiction of the State. [L
1993, c 48, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next